Hawaii statutes.
§612-7 Excused when, for cause. A
prospective juror shall not be excused by a court for slight or trivial cause,
but only when it appears that jury duty would entail a serious personal
hardship, or that for other good cause the prospective juror should be
excused either temporarily or otherwise. [L 1973, c 191, pt of §1; gen ch 1985;
am L 2007, c 122, §4]

Case Notes

Order excusing a juror from further duty is in the discretion
of the court and cannot be reversed by mandamus. 13 H. 332 (1901); 21 H. 66
(1912).

Where prospective juror was prosecutor currently employed by
same office as prosecutor trying the defendant, court shall imply bias as a
matter of law and dismiss prospective juror for cause. 86 H. 195, 948 P.2d
1036 (1997).

Blood relationship between juror's and defendant's families
was not "slight or trivial cause"; thus, it was within court's
discretion to excuse juror for cause. 93 H. 344 (App.), 3 P.3d 510 (2000).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next